Alabama, session 2026rs, SB230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 17-5-7.3 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§17-5-7.3
(a) In addition to the use of campaign contributions
for the purposes listed in Section 17-5-7, campaign
contributions may be used to pay, or reimburse the state or
any county or municipality, for security expenses to protect
the safety of a candidate, an elected official, or an
immediate family or staff member of a candidate or an elected
official. For purposes of this section, "security expenses"
include all of the following:
(1) Reasonable costs of cybersecurity such as data
removal services that find and remove personal information of
a candidate, elected official, or immediate family or staff
member of the candidate or elected official from data brokers
and websites, and other online sources.
Page 1

and websites, and other online sources.
SB230 Enrolled
(2) Reasonable costs of installing and monitoring
nonstructural security devices, including home security
hardware, locks, alarm systems, motion detectors, and security
cameras, provided the security devices are intended to provide
security and not to improve or increase the value of the
property.
(3) Reasonable costs of security personnel for a
candidate, elected official, or immediate family or staff
member of the candidate or elected official.
(b) Any device or other item purchased and installed
pursuant to subsection (a) which is permanently attached to
the property of a candidate, elected official, or immediate
family or staff member of the candidate or elected official is
exempt from the liquidation provisions of Section 17-5-7.2.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
require the state, a county, or a municipality to provide
security solely based on this section.
Section 2. Notwithstanding Section 17-5-7.2, Code of
Alabama 1975, a member of the Legislature who, on or before
January 1, 2026, acquired property described in Section
17-5-7.2(a), Code of Alabama 1975, to furnish his or her
office in the Alabama State House located on South Union
Street in Montgomery, may, in preparation for the demolition
of the building, dispose of such property by donation or in
any other manner, without the need to account for its value
pursuant to Section 17-5-7.2, Code of Alabama 1975.
Section 3. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 2

Section 3. This act shall become effective immediately.
SB230 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB230
Senate 05-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate, as amended.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Amended and passed: 26-Feb-26




Senate concurred in House amendment 26-Feb-26




By: Senator Givhan
Page 3